Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,100
Certificate of appointment or reappointment.

A certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner shall be filed with the secretary or clerk of the governing body making or confirming the appointment or reappointment, and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the proper appointment of such commissioner.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 29.